New York, session 2025-2026, A1586.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs (t) and (u) of subdivision 4 of section 510.10 2 of the criminal procedure law, paragraph (t) as amended and paragraph 3 (u) as added by section 2 of subpart B of part UU of chapter 56 of the 4 laws of 2022, are amended and two new paragraphs (v) and (w) are added 5 to read as follows: 6 (t) any felony or class A misdemeanor involving harm to an identifi- 7 able person or property, or any charge of criminal possession of a 8 firearm as defined in section 265.01-b of the penal law, where such 9 charge arose from conduct occurring while the defendant was released on 10 [his or her] such defendant's own recognizance, released under condi- 11 tions, or had yet to be arraigned after the issuance of a desk appear- 12 ance ticket for a separate felony or class A misdemeanor involving harm 13 to an identifiable person or property, or any charge of criminal 14 possession of a firearm as defined in section 265.01-b of the penal law, 15 provided, however, that the prosecutor must show reasonable cause to 16 believe that the defendant committed the instant crime and any underly- 17 ing crime. For the purposes of this subparagraph, any of the underlying 18 crimes need not be a qualifying offense as defined in this subdivision. 19 For the purposes of this paragraph, "harm to an identifiable person or 20 property" shall include but not be limited to theft of or damage to 21 property. However, based upon a review of the facts alleged in the accu- 22 satory instrument, if the court determines that such theft is negligible 23 and does not appear to be in furtherance of other criminal activity, the 24 principal shall be released on [his or her] such principal's own recog- 25 nizance or under appropriate non-monetary conditions; [or] EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04568-01-5 A. 1586 2 1 (u) criminal possession of a weapon in the third degree as defined in 2 subdivision three of section 265.02 of the penal law or criminal sale of 3 a firearm to a minor as defined in section 265.16 of the penal law[.]; 4 (v) a crime involving promoting prostitution under section 230.25, 5 230.30 or 230.32 of the penal law or compelling prostitution as defined 6 in section 230.33 of the penal law; or 7 (w) labor trafficking as defined in section 135.35 of the penal law or 8 aggravated labor trafficking as defined in section 135.37 of the penal 9 law. 10 § 2. Subparagraphs (xx) and (xxi) of paragraph (b) of subdivision 1 of 11 section 530.20 of the criminal procedure law, subparagraph (xx) as 12 amended and subparagraph (xxi) as added by section 4 of subpart C of 13 part UU of chapter 56 of the laws of 2022, are amended and two new 14 subparagraphs (xxii) and (xxiii) are added to read as follows: 15 (xx) any felony or class A misdemeanor involving harm to an identifi- 16 able person or property, or any charge of criminal possession of a 17 firearm as defined in section 265.01-b of the penal law where such 18 charge arose from conduct occurring while the defendant was released on 19 [his or her] such defendant's own recognizance, released under condi- 20 tions, or had yet to be arraigned after the issuance of a desk appear- 21 ance ticket for a separate felony or class A misdemeanor involving harm 22 to an identifiable person or property, provided, however, that the 23 prosecutor must show reasonable cause to believe that the defendant 24 committed the instant crime and any underlying crime. For the purposes 25 of this subparagraph, any of the underlying crimes need not be a quali- 26 fying offense as defined in this subdivision. For the purposes of this 27 paragraph, "harm to an identifiable person or property" shall include 28 but not be limited to theft of or damage to property. However, based 29 upon a review of the facts alleged in the accusatory instrument, if the 30 court determines that such theft is negligible and does not appear to be 31 in furtherance of other criminal activity, the principal shall be 32 released on [his or her] such principal's own recognizance or under 33 appropriate non-monetary conditions; [or] 34 (xxi) criminal possession of a weapon in the third degree as defined 35 in subdivision three of section 265.02 of the penal law or criminal sale 36 of a firearm to a minor as defined in section 265.16 of the penal 37 law[.]; 38 (xxii) a crime involving promoting prostitution under section 230.25, 39 230.30 or 230.32 of the penal law or compelling prostitution as defined 40 in section 230.33 of the penal law; or 41 (xxiii) labor trafficking as defined in section 135.35 of the penal 42 law or aggravated labor trafficking as defined in section 135.37 of the 43 penal law. 44 § 3. Paragraphs (t) and (u) of subdivision 4 of section 530.40 of the 45 criminal procedure law, paragraph (t) as amended and paragraph (u) as 46 added by section 4 of subpart B of part UU of chapter 56 of the laws of 47 2022, are amended and two new paragraphs (v) and (w) are added to read 48 as follows: 49 (t) any felony or class A misdemeanor involving harm to an identifi- 50 able person or property, or any charge of criminal possession of a 51 firearm as defined in section 265.01-b of the penal law, where such 52 charge arose from conduct occurring while the defendant was released on 53 [his or her] such defendant's own recognizance, released under condi- 54 tions, or had yet to be arraigned after the issuance of a desk appear- 55 ance ticket for a separate felony or class A misdemeanor involving harm 56 to an identifiable person or property, or any charge of criminal A. 1586 3 1 possession of a firearm as defined in section 265.01-b of the penal law, 2 provided, however, that the prosecutor must show reasonable cause to 3 believe that the defendant committed the instant crime and any underly- 4 ing crime. For the purposes of this subparagraph, any of the underlying 5 crimes need not be a qualifying offense as defined in this subdivision. 6 For the purposes of this paragraph, "harm to an identifiable person or 7 property" shall include but not be limited to theft of or damage to 8 property. However, based upon a review of the facts alleged in the accu- 9 satory instrument, if the court determines that such theft is negligible 10 and does not appear to be in furtherance of other criminal activity, the 11 principal shall be released on [his or her] such principal's own recog- 12 nizance or under appropriate non-monetary conditions; [or] 13 (u) criminal possession of a weapon in the third degree as defined in 14 subdivision three of section 265.02 of the penal law or criminal sale of 15 a firearm to a minor as defined in section 265.16 of the penal law[.]; 16 (v) a crime involving promoting prostitution under section 230.25, 17 230.30 or 230.32 of the penal law or compelling prostitution as defined 18 in section 230.33 of the penal law; or 19 (w) labor trafficking as defined in section 135.35 of the penal law or 20 aggravated labor trafficking as defined in section 135.37 of the penal 21 law. 22 § 4. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 23 have become a law.